Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-560
Borrowing power; pledges.

Cities of the second class and villages shall have power to borrow money on the credit of the city, and pledge the credit, revenue, and public property of the city for the payment of debts, when authorized in the manner provided by law.

Laws 1879, § 69, XXIX, p. 217;

Laws 1881, c. 23, XXIX, p. 185;

Laws 1885, c. 20, § 1, XXIX, p. 176;

Laws 1887, c. 12, § 1, XXIX, p. 305;

R.S.1913, § 5134;

C.S.1922, § 4309;

C.S.1929, § 17-458;

R.S.1943, § 17-560;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 185.